Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5499.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 101. (1) When a person has exhausted all administrative
remedies available within an agency, and is aggrieved by a final
decision or order in a contested case, whether such the final
decision or order is affirmative or negative in form, the final
decision or order is subject to direct review by the courts as
provided by law. Exhaustion of administrative remedies does not
require the filing of a motion or application for rehearing or
reconsideration unless the agency rules require the filing before
judicial review is sought. A preliminary, procedural or
RMH H04500'25 (H-1) siuay8


intermediate agency action or ruling is not immediately reviewable,
except that the court may grant leave for review of such the action
if review of the agency's final decision or order would not provide
an adequate remedy.
(2) When a person is denied a permit by an agency of this
state, and after that person has exhausted all administrative
remedies available within an agency, the person may bring a civil
action against the agency that denied the permit. The court shall
award monetary damages and reasonable attorney fees only if the
person that brings the civil action prevails.
Final Page
RMH H04500'25 (H-1) siuay8